Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 2 Peace Officers

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

5 Am. Jur. 2d Arrest §§ 1 to 51, 112 to 115; 70 Am. Jur. 2d Sheriffs, Police and Constables §§ 10, 11, 18, 46 to 67.

Determination of whether crime is charged, 40 ALR2d 1151.

Personal liability of sheriff, policeman or constable, or their bonds, for negligence causing personal injury or death, 60 ALR2d 873.

Liability of owner or occupant of premises to police officer coming thereon in discharge of officer's duty, 30 ALR4th 81.

Security guard company's liability for negligent hiring, supervision, retention or assignment of guard, 44 ALR4th 620.

Liability of police or peace officers for false arrest, imprisonment or malicious prosecution as affected by claim of suppression, failure to disclose or failure to investigate exculpatory evidence, 81 ALR4th 1031.

Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage: enforceability of policy provision limiting appeals from arbitration, 23 ALR5th 834.

Propriety of police action involving application of choke hold, constriction of throat, or the like to prevent accused from swallowing evidence — state cases, 64 ALR5th 741.

When does police officer's use of force during arrest become so excessive as to constitute violation of constitutional rights, imposing liability under Federal Civil Rights Act of 1871 (42 USC § 1983), 60 ALR Fed 204.

80 C.J.S. Sheriffs and Constables §§ 2, 3, 22, 37.

§ 7-2-101.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

7-2-101

through

7-2-107

:

“Deadly weapon” means as defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(iv);

“Felony” means as defined by W.S.

6-10-101

;

“Misdemeanor” means as defined by W.S.

6-10-101

;

“Peace officer” means:

Any duly authorized sheriff, under sheriff or deputy sheriff who has qualified pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-707

;

Any duly authorized member of a municipal police force, a college or university campus police force or the Wyoming highway patrol who has qualified pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-707

;

Game and fish law enforcement personnel qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707 and:

When enforcing felony statutes following observation or discovery of the commission of a felony which was observed or discovered during the performance of their official duties;

While responding to requests to assist other peace officers performing their official duties or when enforcing a valid arrest warrant for any crime;

When performing their official duties or enforcing any provision of title 23 and chapter 13 of title 41, any rule and regulation promulgated by the Wyoming game and fish commission or any other statute for which they are granted statutory enforcement authority; or

While performing a vehicle identification number (VIN) inspection on any watercraft trailer if performed contemporaneously with a hull identification number (HIN) inspection or motorboat certificate of number inspection on a watercraft being carried on the trailer.

Agents of the division of criminal investigation appointed pursuant to W.S.

9-1-613

who have qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707;

Investigators and brand inspectors of the Wyoming livestock board who have qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707:

When enforcing W.S.

6-3-201

,

6-3-401

,

6-3-402

,

6-3-410

,

6-3-601

through

6-3-603

,

6-3-607

,

6-3-610

through

6-3-612

,

6-3-1002

,

6-3-1003

,

6-3-1005

,

6-9-202

,

35-10-101

,

35-10-102

and

35-10-104

, the provisions of title 11 and any laws prohibiting theft, killing or mutilation of livestock or any part thereof and any rule or regulation promulgated by the Wyoming livestock board or any other law for which they are granted statutory enforcement authority;

When responding to a request to assist another peace officer as defined in this paragraph performing his official duty; or

Enforcing a valid arrest warrant for a crime specified in subdivision (E)(I) of this paragraph.

Any duly authorized arson investigator employed by the state fire marshal who has qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707;

Any superintendent, assistant superintendent or full-time park ranger of any state park, state recreation area, state archeological site or state historic site who has qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707, when acting within the boundaries of the state park, state recreation area, state archeological site or state historic site, or when responding to a request to assist other peace officers performing their official duties;

Any duly authorized detention officer in the performance of his duties and who has qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707;

Investigators employed by the Wyoming state board of outfitters and professional guides and qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707, when enforcing W.S.

23-2-401

and

23-2-406

through

23-2-418

and board rules and regulations promulgated under W.S. 23-2-410(a)(ii);

Any peace officer certified by another state who has been appointed as a special deputy sheriff of a Wyoming county pursuant to W.S. 18-3-602(c);

Certified law enforcement officers of an adjoining state while responding to a request for assistance from a peace officer in this state pursuant to the “Law Enforcement Interstate Mutual Aid Act” or other lawful request;

The director and full-time staff instructors of the Wyoming law enforcement academy when duly appointed and acting pursuant to W.S. 9-1-633(b);

Any duly authorized court security officer employed by the Wyoming supreme court who is qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707 when:

Enforcing Wyoming statutes or supreme court rules on premises where the supreme court is conducting business;

In fresh pursuit of a person whom the officer has probable cause to believe has committed within the officer’s jurisdiction a violation of a state statute, or for whom an arrest warrant is outstanding for any criminal offense; or

When responding to a request to assist other peace officers acting within the scope of their official duties in their own jurisdiction.

Any person qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707 and employed by the Wyoming gaming commission when engaged in the performance of that person’s duties or when responding to a request to assist other peace officers acting within the scope of their official duties in their own jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 205, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-12.1; Laws 1979, ch. 123, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1991, ch. 187, § 1; 1992, ch. 31, § 1; 1994, ch. 47, § 1; 1996, ch. 68, § 1; 2000, ch. 61, § 1; 2001, ch. 45, § 1; ch. 49, § 1; ch. 133, § 1; ch. 177, §§ 1, 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 64, § 2; 2003, ch. 53, § 2; ch. 118, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2009, ch. 10, § 1; 2010, ch. 73, § 1; 2014 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 90, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 114, § 2, effective March 17, 2020; 2020 ch. 121, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 30, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to county sheriffs, see §

18-3-601

et seq.

As to highway patrol, see chapter 12 of title 24.

The 2006 amendment

made a stylistic change in (a)(iv)(M).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2009 amendment,

in (a)(iv)(G), inserted “state recreation area, state archeological site” twice, and inserted “state” preceding “historic site” twice.

Laws 2009, ch. 10, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2009.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(iv)(O), and made related changes.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added (a)(iv)(C)(IV); and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 90, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(iv)(E)(I) substituted “6-3-401,

6-3-402

,

6-3-410

” for “6-3-401 through

6-3-403

,

6-3-407

,

6-3-410

.”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 114, § 2, added (a)(iv)(P) and made a related change.

Laws 2020, ch. 114, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 17, 2020.

The third 2020 amendment, by ch. 121, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(iv)(C)(I) substituted “official duties” for “statutory duties”; and in (a)(iv)(C)(III) substituted “When performing their official duties or enforcing” for “When enforcing.”

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (a)(iv)(E)(I), deleted "6-3-203" following "6-3-201" and added "6-3-1002,

6-3-1003

,

6-3-1005

."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(iv)(I) or (a)(iv)(L) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2022, Ch. 48, §§ 1 and 2, state as follows:

“Section 1.

“(a) The legislature finds that:

“(i) As a result of the 2021 General Session of the Wyoming Legislature, 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109 (original 2021 Senate File 56) (‘2021 Act’) became law. The 2021 Act intended to repeal Section 1 of 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114 (original 2020 House Bill 171) (‘2020 Act’) and to codify and otherwise address all issues contained in Section 1 of the 2020 Act;

“(ii) The 2021 Act was not intended to repeal the 2020 Act in its entirety. However, due to a scrivener's error, the 2021 Act omitted a reference to ‘Section 1’ in Section 6, the ‘repealer section’ and instead stated, ‘2020 Wyoming Sessions Laws, Chapter 114 is repealed[;]’;

“(iii) Repeal of the entire 2020 Act was not intended by the legislature in the 2021 Act;

“(iv) The legislature finds it necessary to clarify its intent and to enact into law appropriate legislation, as contained in this act.

“Section 2. 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109, Section 6 is amended to read:

“Section 6. 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114, Section 1 is repealed.”

Applicability. —

Laws 1996, ch. 68, § 2, effective July 1, 1996, provides that the act applies to capitol police designated and appointed after July 1, 1996. The section further provides that the capitol police employed prior to July 1, 1996 may elect to contribute and receive service retirement benefits under the Wyoming state highway patrol, game and fish warden and criminal investigator retirement program in lieu of contribution under the Wyoming retirement system, provides for the transfer of contributions pursuant to this election, makes these electors subject to certain benefit provisions, provides for the determination by the actuary for the Wyoming retirement system of the financial and actuarial impact of participation in the Wyoming state highway patrol, game and fish warden and criminal investigator retirement program, and provides for payment for the actuary determination by the attorney general.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Peace officer may include federal officers. —

Section

31-6-102

states that a breathalyzer test may be administered by a peace officer which is defined by this section to include various positions, all of which share one important common fact: they are state employees. However, if a federal officer is precluded from administering a breathalyzer test under §

31-6-102

to an individual who is arrested on federal property, then it stands to follow that no one could administer a breath test to that individual. This literal reading would lead to an absurd result; therefore, a federal airman officer could execute the breathalyzer test on federal property. United States v. Santiago, 846 F. Supp. 1486, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2766 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Campus police officer. —

A campus police officer acting without a warrant may not lawfully arrest an individual outside of campus boundaries for driving while under the influence unless such arrest is the result of fresh pursuit. Marshall v. State ex rel. DOT, 941 P.2d 42,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1997).

Game and fish personnel

meet the statutory definition of peace officers only (1) when enforcing Wyoming felony statutes following observation or discovery of the commission of a felony that occurs during the performance of their statutory duties; or (2) while responding to requests to assist other peace officers performing their official duties. Peterson v. Wyoming Game And Fish Comm'n, 989 P.2d 113,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1999).

Game and fish personnel serving as bear management officers were not performing the functions of a “peace officer” and thus the officers' alleged negligence in monitoring a grizzly bear who mauled a hunter did not give rise to liability under §

1-39-112

.Peterson v. Wyoming Game And Fish Comm'n, 989 P.2d 113,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1999).

Park rangers' cooperative agreement. —

Park rangers had authority to enter into a cooperative law enforcement agreement with game and fish wardens in advance of the need for specific assistance. Nelson v. State, 960 P.2d 1011,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1998).

Quoted

in

Hurst v. State, 698 P.2d 1130,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 468

(Wyo. 1985); Van Horn v. State, 802 P.2d 883,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1990); W.A.R.M. v. Bonds, 866 P.2d 1291,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

EEOC v. Wyoming, 514 F. Supp. 595, 1981 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12203 (D. Wyo. 1981); Graham v. Wyoming Peace Officer Stds. & Training Comm'n, 737 P.2d 1060,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 458

(Wyo. 1987); Vigil v. Ruettgers, 887 P.2d 521,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1994); McKenzie v. Dovala,

2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 3844

, 242 F.3d 967 (10th Cir. 2001); Boyer-Gladden v. Hill, 2010 WY 12, 224 P.3d 21,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Feb. 9, 2010).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Personal liability of policeman, sheriff or similar peace officer, or his bond, for injury suffered as a result of failure to enforce law or arrest law breaker, 41 ALR3d 700.

§ 7-2-102.
Preconditions for arrests.

A peace officer may arrest a person when the officer has a warrant commanding that the person be arrested or the officer has reasonable grounds for believing that a warrant for the person’s arrest has been issued in this state or in another jurisdiction.

A peace officer may arrest a person without a warrant when:

Any criminal offense is being committed in the officer’s presence by the person to be arrested;

The officer has probable cause to believe that a felony has been committed and that the person to be arrested has committed it; or

The officer has probable cause to believe that a misdemeanor has been committed, that the person to be arrested has committed it and that the person, unless immediately arrested:

Will not be apprehended;

May cause injury to himself or others or damage to property; or

May destroy or conceal evidence of the commission of the misdemeanor.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 205, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-12.2; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1993, ch. 165, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to arrests and preliminary hearings, see chapter 8 of this title.

Probable cause. —

Probable cause to arrest without a warrant exists when the facts and circumstances within the knowledge of the arresting officer together with facts and circumstances about which the officer has trustworthy information are sufficient to justify a reasonably cautious or prudent person in the belief that the person to be arrested has committed or is committing an offense. Carroll v. State, 938 P.2d 848,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1997), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Uniformed peace officer is lawfully performing official duty when he makes arrest,

even if it later appears that arrest warrant is invalid. A person who resists such an arrest can be convicted. Roberts v. State, 711 P.2d 1131,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 625

(Wyo. 1985).

Municipal police

must execute municipal arrest warrants within the “territorial jurisdiction” of the municipal judge who issued the warrant. Van Horn v. State, 802 P.2d 883,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1990).

Home, private place, makes probable cause insufficient. —

It is true that subsection (b) authorizes exceptions to the warrant requirement for arrest; however, when the threshold of a home or private place of business intervenes, probable cause is insufficient to warrant entry absent the presence of exigent circumstances or the audience of a neutral and detached magistrate. Mickelson v. State, 906 P.2d 1020,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1995).

Probable cause shown. —

Law enforcement officers had probable cause to believe that defendant had purchased cocaine and was carrying it with him where the officers knew that the defendant had twice visited a residence where a confidential informant had successfully purchased cocaine, the owner of the residence had stated that the defendant was coming over and that he was “holding an ounce” for him, and the officers knew that the defendant had previously been convicted of a drug offense. Carroll v. State, 938 P.2d 848,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1997), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Defendant's arrest was justified under subparagraph (b)(iii)(B), where officers had probable cause to believe he had committed property destruction and breach of peace, and that he carried an automatic rifle and where they learned of an unfinished encounter between defendant and a third party. United States v. Davis, 197 F.3d 1048, 1999 U.S. App. LEXIS 30654 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1999).

An officer had probable cause to execute the warrantless arrest of defendant for interference with a peace officer where defendant used abusive language to the officer, told that officer that the officer could not investigate a disturbance complaint, and positioned himself between the stairs and the officer. Brown v. State, 2005 WY 37, 109 P.3d 52,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2005).

Discretionary function. —

District court properly dismissed wrongful death action against police officer who did not arrest an intoxicated motorist following a traffic stop; a police officer's decision to arrest is a discretionary function, not mandated by Wyoming statutes. McCoy v. Crook County Sheriff's Dep't, 987 P.2d 674,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1999).

Sheriff could have owed a duty to have arrested intoxicateddriver. —

Trial court erred in dismissing a wrongful death action brought by mother against sheriff and county, on behalf of her son who was killed by an intoxicated driver; after determining that the intoxicated driver immediately intended to drive to follow an ambulance to the hospital to be with an injured friend, the sheriff had a duty to do what an ordinarily prudent law enforcement officer would have done under like circumstances.
Becker v. Mason, 2006 WY 143, 145 P.3d 1268,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2006).

Applied

in

Nellis v. Wyoming DOT, 932 P.2d 741,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1997).

Quoted

in

United States v. Maher, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13872, 724 F. Supp. 1348 (D. Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Lobatos v. State, 875 P.2d 716,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to resist excessive force used in accomplishing lawful arrest, 77 ALR3d 281.

Modern status: right of peace officer to use deadly force in attempting to arrest fleeing felon, 83 ALR3d 174.

Peace officer's civil liability for death or personal injuries caused by intentional force in arresting misdemeanant, 83 ALR3d 238.

Liability for false arrest or imprisonment under warrant as affected by mistake as to identity of person arrested, 39 ALR4th 705.

§ 7-2-103.
Issuance of citations.

A citation may issue as a charging document for any misdemeanor which the issuing officer has probable cause to believe was committed by the person to whom the citation was issued.

A person may be released if, after investigation, it appears that the person:

Does not present a danger to himself or others;

Will not injure or destroy the property of others;

Will appear for future court proceedings; and

Is willing to accept the citation, thereby promising to appear in court at the time and on the date specified in the citation.

The person may be released from custody upon the directive of:

The arresting officer;

The district attorney or, for cases being prosecuted in municipal court, the city attorney;

Another peace officer designated by the sheriff or, for cases being prosecuted in municipal court, the chief of police.

The citation for a person in custody may be issued by the arresting officer or by another peace officer designated by:

The district attorney or the city attorney for cases being prosecuted in municipal court; or

The sheriff or the chief of police for cases being prosecuted in municipal court.

For purposes of this section, “issuing officer” means a peace officer, or a special municipal officer acting in accordance with the terms of his appointment under W.S. 15-1-103(a)(l). A “special municipal officer” means a municipal employee whose duties include the areas of animal control, parking or municipal code enforcement.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 205, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-12.3; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 11, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1993, ch. 165, § 1; 2007, ch. 50, § 1; 2011, ch. 167, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to arrests and preliminary hearings, see chapter 8 of this title.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (e).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b)(iv), substituted “accept the citation, thereby” for “sign a citation.”

Authority statutes. —

This section and §

31-5-1204

are authority statutes: they address only what a peace officer may do in his official capacity without running afoul of the due process provisions of the United States and Wyoming Constitutions. They are not jurisdictional statutes. State v. Stahl, 838 P.2d 1193,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1992).

Section is appropriate expression of due process. —

This section is an appropriate expression of the state and federal constitutional guarantee of every citizen's right to due process of law. Rodarte v. Riverton, 552 P.2d 1245,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 1976).

Actions of police officers in escorting defendant to patrol car constituted detention of personal liberty from and after that time.

Raigosa v. State, 562 P.2d 1009,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1977).

Officer must arrest for offense in his presence. —

It is officer's duty to arrest without warrant when offense is being committed in his presence. State v. Young, 40 Wyo. 508, 281 P. 17,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1929).

And may follow and arrest for such offense without warrant.—

A peace officer may follow one who, in his presence, has broken the peace and arrest him without a warrant. Meldrum v. State, 23 Wyo. 12, 146 P. 596,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1915).

In felony cases arrest may be based on reasonable suspicion.

State v. George, 32 Wyo. 223, 231 P. 683,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1924).

Constitutional requirements for arrest without warrant. —

A peace officer may constitutionally arrest a person without a warrant if, at the moment the arrest is made, he has probable cause to believe that a crime had been committed by the person to be arrested or he has reasonable grounds to believe that a crime is being committed in his presence by the person to be arrested. De Herrera v. State, 589 P.2d 845,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1979); Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

Probable cause must warrant belief crime has been or is beingcommitted. —

Probable cause exists where the facts and circumstances within the officers' knowledge and of which they had reasonably trustworthy information are sufficient in themselves to warrant a man of reasonable caution in the belief that an offense has been or is being committed. Rodarte v. Riverton, 552 P.2d 1245,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 1976); Raigosa v. State, 562 P.2d 1009,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1977).

And that person arrested committed or is committing it. —

Criminal probable cause is the cause which logically leads to a conclusion that the person to be arrested is the one who had committed or was engaged in the commission of the crime. Rodarte v. Riverton, 552 P.2d 1245,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 1976).

Determination of probable cause to arrest without warrant

depends upon whether the facts and circumstances within the peace officer's knowledge and of which he has reasonably trustworthy information were sufficient to warrant a reasonably cautious or prudent man to believe that the person arrested has committed or is committing an offense. Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

The facts and circumstances which justify a determination that probable cause was present must amount to more than mere suspicion, but they need not rise to the level of proof of guilt, nor even to the level of prima facie evidence of guilt. The determination of whether the standard was met must be made upon an evaluation of the record. Jandro v. State, 781 P.2d 512,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1989).

No exact definition of probable cause. —

What constitutes probable cause, or its functional equivalent in Wyoming law, reasonable grounds sufficient to authorize a warrantless arrest, is, like many other things in the law, incapable of exact definition. Raigosa v. State, 562 P.2d 1009,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1977).

Officer may rely on collective knowledge. —

It is not necessary that the arresting officer personally have all of the information about all of the elements which constitute probable cause. He is entitled to rely on the collective knowledge of the other investigating officers. Jandro v. State, 781 P.2d 512,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1989).

Undisclosed informant's tip may be used to establish probable cause

for arrest if the information is corroborated by other reliable information with the officer's knowledge. De Herrera v. State, 589 P.2d 845,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1979).

An arresting officer may use information he gathers to bolster a tip by an informant to the point that there exists probable cause for arrest, if the information gathered by the officer is corroborative of the informant's tip; therefore, where the police made an arrest based upon the information that had come to them from an anonymous informant, and there was further corroboration of that information by the law enforcement officer both prior to and after the investigatory stop and the other information gained at that time, the police officers had the requisite probable cause for a warrantless arrest in accordance with this section. Goettl v. State, 842 P.2d 549,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1992).

Evidence demonstrated requisite probable cause for officer to stop defendant for traffic violation

(driving in more than one lane of traffic on a four-lane city street, in violation of § 31-5-209(a)(i)). See Norman v. State, 747 P.2d 520,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 563

(Wyo. 1987), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. Jan. 12, 1988).

Territorial jurisdiction for arrest by municipal police. —

Municipal police must execute municipal arrest warrants within the “territorial jurisdiction” of the municipal judge who issued the warrant. Van Horn v. State, 802 P.2d 883,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1990).

A municipal peace officer acting without a warrant

may not lawfully arrest an individual DWUI outside of the boundaries of the municipality which he serves, unless such arrest is the result of fresh pursuit. State v. Stahl, 838 P.2d 1193,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1992).

Appellate inquiry into legality of arrest. —

An appellate court's inquiry into whether or not an arrest is legal in a given case is restricted to an objective consideration of the evidence in the record. Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

Arrest justified. —

Deputy sheriff was justified in arresting defendant whom he saw carrying a still to property of another. State v. Rotolo, 39 Wyo. 181, 270 P. 665,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1928).

It was duty of officers, on noticing odor of liquor emanating from defendant's automobile, to arrest defendant for violating law in their presence, and reason stated for arrest was immaterial. State v. Young, 40 Wyo. 508, 281 P. 17,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1929).

Probable cause not shown. —

Where officers ordered plaintiff into the patrol car, handcuffed, taken to the police station and searched because they suspected that she was in possession of marijuana, they made no efforts to confirm these suspicions and they had no facts upon which to base them except that she was present in a vehicle with others at a time when marijuana was discovered, this constituted the probable cause upon which the officers relied but it did not constitute probable cause in the constitutional context. Rodarte v. Riverton, 552 P.2d 1245,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 1976).

Subsequent disclosure of crime. —

Disclosure of evidence of crime by search does not legalize preceding unlawful arrest. State v. George, 32 Wyo. 223, 231 P. 683,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1924).

Resisting arrest for breach of peace committed in officer'spresence punishable. —

A police officer had probable cause to believe that the defendant was committing a breach of peace as defined by a municipal ordinance. His arrest of the defendant was lawful, therefore, under subsection (a)(i), because a criminal act was occurring in the presence of the officer. The bodily harm that the defendant inflicted on the officer while resisting the lawful arrest occurred while the officer was “in the performance of his official duties” and was properly punishable. Simmons v. State, 712 P.2d 887,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 449

(Wyo. 1986).

Proof required in suit for false arrest. —

In a civil suit for false arrest, officers are required to allege and prove not only that they believed in good faith that their conduct in the arrest of plaintiff was lawful, but also that such a good-faith belief on their part was reasonable. Town of Jackson v. Shaw, 569 P.2d 1246,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1977).

Standard of police conduct in suit for wrongful arrest. —

See Rodarte v. Riverton, 552 P.2d 1245,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 1976); Town of Jackson v. Shaw, 569 P.2d 1246,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1977).

Discretionary function. —

District court properly dismissed wrongful death action against police officer who did not arrest an intoxicated motorist following a traffic stop; a police officer's decision to arrest is a discretionary function, not mandated by Wyoming statutes. McCoy v. Crook County Sheriff's Dep't, 987 P.2d 674,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1999).

Sheriff could have owed a duty to have arrested intoxicateddriver. —

Trial court erred in dismissing a wrongful death action brought by mother against sheriff and county, on behalf of her son who was killed by an intoxicated driver; after determining that the intoxicated driver immediately intended to drive to follow an ambulance to the hospital to be with an injured friend, the sheriff had a duty to do what an ordinarily prudent law enforcement officer would have done under like circumstances.
Becker v. Mason, 2006 WY 143, 145 P.3d 1268,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2006).

Applied

in

Ostrowski v. State, 665 P.2d 471,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1983); United States v. Maher, 919 F.2d 1482,

1990 U.S. App. LEXIS 21014

(10th Cir. 1990); Lobatos v. State, 875 P.2d 716,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1994); Nellis v. Wyoming DOT, 932 P.2d 741,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1997).

Quoted

in

Sandborn v. State, 735 P.2d 435,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 420

(Wyo. 1987).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Power of Peace Officers to Arrest Without Warrant in Wyoming,” see VII Wyo. L.J. 100.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Delay in making arrest without a warrant for misdemeanor or breach of peace, 58 ALR2d 1056.

Police officer's power to enter private house or inclosure to make arrest, without a warrant, for a suspected misdemeanor, 76 ALR2d 1432.

Right to resist excessive force used in accomplishing lawful arrest, 77 ALR3d 281.

Modern status: right of peace officer to use deadly force in attempting to arrest fleeing felon, 83 ALR3d 174.

Peace officers' civil liability for death or personal injuries caused by intentional force in arresting misdemeanant, 83 ALR3d 238.

Validity, in state criminal trial, of arrest without warrant by identified peace officer outside of jurisdiction, when not in fresh pursuit, 34 ALR4th 328.

Burden of proof in civil action for using unreasonable force in making arrest as to reasonableness of force used, 82 ALR4th 598.

§ 7-2-104.
Authority to seize deadly weapons; disposition.

A peace officer may take into possession any deadly weapons found in the possession of a person arrested if:

The peace officer has reason to believe the weapon will be used to endanger the safety of the officer or the public; or

The person arrested might seek to use the weapon to resist arrest or to escape.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, nothing in this section shall authorize a peace officer to take into possession any deadly weapon when enforcing the game and fish provisions contained in title 23 of the Wyoming statutes provided the safety of the officer or the public is not endangered. A peace officer may take into possession a deadly weapon as authorized by W.S.

23-6-208

.

Deadly weapons seized under this section shall be returned or disposed of as provided by W.S.

7-2-105

unless otherwise ordered by the court.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 162, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-20; W.S. 1977, § 7-2-110; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1999, ch. 94, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to weapon offenses, see chapter 8 of title 6.

Stated

in

United States v. Maher, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13872, 724 F. Supp. 1348 (D. Wyo. 1989).